Utah statutes.
75-5-202.   Appointment of guardian of minor.

(1) The parent of a minor may appoint a guardian of an unemancipated minor by will, as provided in this section, or by other written instrument as provided in Section 75-5-202.5.

(2)  Subject to the rights of the minor and others under Section 75-5-203, an appointment by will or written instrument becomes effective upon filing the guardian's acceptance in the court in which the will is probated or the document is filed, if before acceptance, both parents are dead or the surviving parent is adjudged incapacitated.

(3)  If both parents are dead, an effective appointment by the parent who died later has priority.

(4)  This state recognizes a testamentary appointment effected by filing the guardian's acceptance under a will probated in another state which is the testator's domicile.

(5)  Upon acceptance of appointment, written notice of acceptance shall be given by the guardian to the minor and to the person having his care, or to his nearest adult relative.

